Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Subchapter 3. Rules of Construction

§ 171.
Court; officer; board.

When a court, officer, or board is named by official title, such designation shall apply to the court, officer, or board of the county, town, or place within and for which they are qualified to act.

§ 172.
Joint authority.

When joint authority is given to three or more, the concurrence of a majority of such number shall be sufficient and shall be required in its exercise.

§ 173.
Minors.

Persons of the age of 18 years shall be considered of age and until they attain that age, shall be minors.
Whenever referred to in the laws of this State, a person who is an adult or who has attained majority shall be a resident or nonresident person of 18 years of age or more.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 90

, § 1;

1971, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 174.
Notice by publication.

When a notice is required to be given by publication in a newspaper, it shall mean a newspaper published in the county where the subject matter is situated, pending or to be heard, or a newspaper published within the State which has a general circulation.
In any case, in its discretion, the court may cause such notice to be further published in a newspaper which circulates in the neighborhood of the persons interested. Whenever a notice of any kind is required to be given by publication in a newspaper prior to a certain date for a certain number of weeks successively, it may be given by an insertion prior to such date once a week, for the number of successive weeks required, either in a daily, semiweekly, or weekly newspaper.
If such publication is in a daily or semiweekly newspaper, such notice shall be inserted on the same day of each successive week.

§ 175.
Number; gender.

Words importing the singular number may extend and be applied to more than one person or thing; words importing the plural number may be applied as if singular and words importing the masculine may extend and be applied to persons of the feminine gender.

§ 176.
Title; chapter; section.

The words “title,” “chapter,” and “section” when used by way of reference shall mean a title, chapter, or section of Vermont Statutes Annotated.

§ 177.
Domicile.

Marital status shall not be the sole or determinative factor of a person’s domicile.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Apr. 23, 1980.